Connecticut, session 2026, HB05081.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to (1) establish
an additional marginal rate for the personal income tax of at least four
per cent on the portion of an individual's taxable income in excess of one
million dollars, and (2) dedicate the revenue generated from such tax to
education, higher education, child care and the repair and maintenance
of, and access to, roads, bridges and public transportation.